Hawaii statutes.
§159-39 Dead, dying, disabled, or diseased
animals. No person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or
transporting in intrastate commerce, dead, dying, disabled, or diseased
animals, or any parts of the carcasses of any animals that died otherwise than
by slaughter, shall buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or
receive for transportation, in commerce, any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased
cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other equines, or parts of the
carcasses of any such animals that died otherwise than by slaughter, unless the
transaction or transportation is made in accordance with the rules that the
board may adopt to assure that the animals, or the parts or products thereof,
will be prevented from being used for human food purposes. [L 1969, c 214, pt
of §1; am L 1990, c 139, §10; am L 1991, c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next